src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
*Noun 10 front k̃~0 examples:*
* *hölkkä:* `hölkkä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # jog)
* *hölkkää:* `hölkkä+N+Sg+Par`
* *hölkkänä:* `hölkkä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *hölkässä:* `hölkkä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *hölkkinä:* `hölkkä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *hölkissä:* `hölkkä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *hölkkien:* `hölkkä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back p~0 examples:*
* *kuoppa:* `kuoppa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # pothole)
* *kuoppaa:* `kuoppa+N+Sg+Par`
* *kuoppana:* `kuoppa+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kuopassa:* `kuoppa+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kuoppina:* `kuoppa+N+Pl+Ess`
* *kuopissa:* `kuoppa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kuoppien:* `kuoppa+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front p~0 examples:*
* *seppä:* `seppä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # blacksmith)
* *seppää:* `seppä+N+Sg+Par`
* *seppänä:* `seppä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *sepässä:* `seppä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *seppinä:* `seppä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *sepissä:* `seppä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *seppien:* `seppä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back t~0 examples:*
* *rotta:* `rotta+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # rat)
* *rottaa:* `rotta+N+Sg+Par`
* *rottana:* `rotta+N+Sg+Ess`
* *rotassa:* `rotta+N+Sg+Ine`
* *rottina:* `rotta+N+Pl+Ess`
* *rotissa:* `rotta+N+Pl+Ine`
* *rottien:* `rotta+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front t~0 examples:*
* *kenttä:* `kenttä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # field)
* *kenttää:* `kenttä+N+Sg+Par`
* *kenttänä:* `kenttä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kentässä:* `kenttä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kenttinä:* `kenttä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *kentissä:* `kenttä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kenttien:* `kenttä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back k~’~0 examples:*
* *vuoka:* `vuoka+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. baking tray)
* *vuokaa:* `vuoka+N+Sg+Par`
* *vuokana:* `vuoka+N+Sg+Ess`
* *vuoassa:* `vuoka+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vuo’assa:* `vuoka+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vuokina:* `vuoka+N+Pl+Ess`
* *vuoissa:* `vuoka+N+Pl+Ine`
* *vuo’issa:* `vuoka+N+Pl+Ine`
* *vuokien:* `vuoka+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front k~’~0 examples:*
* *ikä:* `ikä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # age)
* *ikää:* `ikä+N+Sg+Par`
* *ikänä:* `ikä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *iässä:* `ikä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *i’issä:* `ikä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *ikiin:* `ikä+N+Pl+Ill`


*Noun 10 back k~’~0 examples:*
* *reikä:* `reikä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # hole)
* *reikää:* `reikä+N+Sg+Par`
* *reikänä:* `reikä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *reiässä:* `reikä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *rei’issä:* `reikä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *reikiin:* `reikä+N+Pl+Ill`


*Noun 10 back p~v examples:*
* *lupa:* `lupa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # permit)
* *lupaa:* `lupa+N+Sg+Par`
* *lupana:* `lupa+N+Sg+Ess`
* *luvassa:* `lupa+N+Sg+Ine`
* *lupina:* `lupa+N+Pl+Ess`
* *luvissa:* `lupa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *lupien:* `lupa+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front p~v examples:*
* *leipä:* `leipä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bread)
* *leipää:* `leipä+N+Sg+Par`
* *leipänä:* `leipä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *leivässä:* `leipä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *leipinä:* `leipä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *leivissä:* `leipä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *leipien:* `leipä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back t~d examples:*
* *sota:* `sota+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # war)
* *sotaa:* `sota+N+Sg+Par`
* *sotana:* `sota+N+Sg+Ess`
* *sodassa:* `sota+N+Sg+Ine`
* *sotina:* `sota+N+Pl+Ess`
* *sodissa:* `sota+N+Pl+Ine`
* *sotien:* `sota+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front t~d examples:*
* *pöytä:* `pöytä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # table)
* *pöytää:* `pöytä+N+Sg+Par`
* *pöytänä:* `pöytä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *pöydässä:* `pöytä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *pöytinä:* `pöytä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *pöydissä:* `pöytä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *pöytien:* `pöytä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back k~g examples:*
* *honka:* `honka+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. kind of a tree)
* *honkaa:* `honka+N+Sg+Par`
* *honkana:* `honka+N+Sg+Ess`
* *hongassa:* `honka+N+Sg+Ine`
* *honkina:* `honka+N+Pl+Ess`
* *hongissa:* `honka+N+Pl+Ine`
* *honkien:* `honka+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 frot k~g examples:*
* *kenkä:* `kenkä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # shoe)
* *kenkää:* `kenkä+N+Sg+Par`
* *kenkänä:* `kenkä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kengässä:* `kenkä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kengissä:* `kenkä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kenkiin:* `kenkä+N+Pl+Ill`



*Noun 10 back p~m examples:*
* *kompa:* `kompa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. trick question)
* *kompaa:* `kompa+N+Sg+Par`
* *kompana:* `kompa+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kommassa:* `kompa+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kompina:* `kompa+N+Pl+Ess`
* *kommissa:* `kompa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kompien:* `kompa+N+Pl+Gen`

There is a gap for ä-final word with p:m variation


*Noun 10 back t~l examples:*
* *multa:* `multa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # dirt)
* *multaa:* `multa+N+Sg+Par`
* *multana:* `multa+N+Sg+Ess`
* *mullassa:* `multa+N+Sg+Ine`
* *multina:* `multa+N+Pl+Ess`
* *mullissa:* `multa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *multien:* `multa+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front t~l examples:*
* *syltä:* `syltä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ???)
* *syltää:* `syltä+N+Sg+Par`
* *syltänä:* `syltä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *syllässä:* `syltä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *syltinä:* `syltä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *syllissä:* `syltä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *syltien:* `syltä+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 back t~n examples:*
* *kunta:* `kunta+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # municipality)
* *kuntaa:* `kunta+N+Sg+Par`
* *kuntana:* `kunta+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kunnassa:* `kunta+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kuntina:* `kunta+N+Pl+Ess`
* *kunnissa:* `kunta+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kuntien:* `kunta+N+Pl+Gen`


*Noun 10 front t~n examples:*
* *emäntä:* `emäntä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # hostess)
* *emäntää:* `emäntä+N+Sg+Par`
* *emäntänä:* `emäntä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *emännässä:* `emäntä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *emäntinä:* `emäntä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *emännissä:* `emäntä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *emäntien:* `emäntä+N+Pl+Gen`







There is a gap for k:j gradation in a-final stems.


*Noun 10 front k~j examples:*
* *selkä:* `selkä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # back)
* *selkää:* `selkä+N+Sg+Par`
* *selkänä:* `selkä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *seljässä:* `selkä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *seljissä:* `selkä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *selkiin:* `selkä+N+Pl+Ill`


Certain trisyllabic stems allow both variations of a:o and a:0 for plural
forms.

*Noun 11 back examples:*
* *probleema:* `probleema+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # problem)
* *probleemia:* `probleema+N+Pl+Par`
* *probleemoita:* `probleema+N+Pl+Par`
* *probleemien:* `probleema+N+Pl+Gen`
* *probleemoitten:* `probleema+N+Pl+Gen`
* *probleemoiden:* `probleema+N+Pl+Gen`
* *probleemiin:* `probleema+N+Pl+Ill`
* *probleemoihin:* `probleema+N+Pl+Ill`
Also less commonly:
* *probleemain:* `probleema+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`
* *probleemojen:* `probleema+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *probleemoja:* `probleema+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par`


*Noun 11 front examples:*
* *käpälä:* `käpälä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # paw)
* *käpälää:* `käpälä+N+Sg+Par`
* *käpälänä:* `käpälä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *käpälässä:* `käpälä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *käpälinä:* `käpälä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *käpälien:* `käpälä+N+Pl+Gen`
* *käpäliin:* `käpälä+N+Pl+Ill`

Some a stems with a:o variation have slightly different set of allomorphs


*Nouns 12 back examples:*
* *makkara:* `makkara+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sausage)
* *makkaraa:* `makkara+N+Sg+Par`
* *makkarana:* `makkara+N+Sg+Ess`
* *makkaroina:* `makkara+N+Pl+Ess`
* *makkaroita:* `makkara+N+Pl+Par`


*Nouns 12 front examples:*
* *häkkyrä:* `häkkyrä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # thingie)
* *häkkyrää:* `häkkyrä+N+Sg+Par`
* *häkkyränä:* `häkkyrä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *häkkyröinä:* `häkkyrä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *häkkyröitä:* `häkkyrä+N+Pl+Par`

There is a possible class for further variation of a:o
in the old dictionary dictionary that is worth re-evaluating.

There’s one more allomorph pattern.


*Nouns 12++ front examples:*
* *mörinä:* `mörinä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # murr)
* *mörinää:* `mörinä+N+Sg+Par`
* *mörinänä:* `mörinä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *mörinässä:* `mörinä+N+Sg+Ine`

The trisyllabic a-final words with quantitative consonant gradation allow
same illative variation as o, u, y, and ö finals described earlier.


*Nouns 14 back examples:*
* *lusikka:* `lusikka+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # spoon)
* *lusikkoina:* `lusikka+N+Pl+Ess`
* *lusikoissa:* `lusikka+N+Pl+Ine`
* *lusikoihin:* `lusikka+N+Pl+Ill`
* *lusikkoihin:* `lusikka+N+Pl+Ill`


*Nouns 14 front examples:*
* *kämmekkä:* `kämmekkä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # handy)
* *kämmeköihin:* `kämmekkä+N+Pl+Ill`
* *kämmekköihin:* `kämmekkä+N+Pl+Ill`


*Nouns 14 back p̃0 examples:*
* *ulappa:* `ulappa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # horizon)
* *ulappoina:* `ulappa+N+Pl+Ess`
* *ulapoissa:* `ulappa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *ulapoihin:* `ulappa+N+Pl+Ill`
* *ulappoihin:* `ulappa+N+Pl+Ill`


*Nouns 14 back t0 examples:*
* *pohatta:* `pohatta+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # shark)
* *pohattoina:* `pohatta+N+Pl+Ess`
* *pohatoissa:* `pohatta+N+Pl+Ine`
* *pohattoihin:* `pohatta+N+Pl+Ill`
* *pohatoihin:* `pohatta+N+Pl+Ill`

The a-final words ending in long vowels with syllable boundary have a:0
variation and more allomorphs for plyral GENITIVE or illative.


*Nouns 15 ea examples:*
* *sokea:* `sokea+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # blind)
* *sokeana:* `sokea+N+Sg+Ess`
* *sokeina:* `sokea+N+Pl+Ess`
* *sokeissa:* `sokea+N+Pl+Ine`
* *sokeihin:* `sokea+N+Pl+Ill`
* *sokeisiin:* `sokea+N+Pl+Ill`


*Nouns 15 eä examples:*
* *lipeä:* `lipeä+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. sodium hydroxide)
* *lipeänä:* `lipeä+N+Sg+Ess`
* *lipeinä:* `lipeä+N+Pl+Ess`
* *lipeissä:* `lipeä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *lipeihin:* `lipeä+N+Pl+Ill`
* *lipeisiin:* `lipeä+N+Pl+Ill`

### Lexicalised comparatives
Lexicalised comparatives have the same special inflection pattern as
comparatives have: stem final i varies with a, and mp gradates into mm.
There are  not many comparatives that lexicalise into nouns.


*Nouns 16 examples:*
* *vanhempi:* `vanhempi+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # parent)
* *vanhempana:* `vanhempi+N+Sg+Ess`
* *vanhemmassa:* `vanhempi+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vanhempina:* `vanhempi+N+Pl+Ess`
* *vanhemmista:* `vanhempi+N+Pl+Ela`

### Long vowel stems
The long vowel stems have shortening variation in plural inflection, and
special singular illatives, partitives. 

Bisyllabic and longer stems with long vowels have -seen illative suffix.
This class has some of the old -UU derivations.

*Nouns 17 a examples:*
* *vapaa:* `vapaa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # free)
* *vapaata:* `vapaa+N+Sg+Par`
* *vapaaseen:* `vapaa+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 17 o examples:*
* *tienoo:* `tienoo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # neighborhood)
* *tienoota:* `tienoo+N+Sg+Par`
* *tienooseen:* `tienoo+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 17 u examples:*
* *kerjuu:* `kerjuu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # begging)
* *kerjuuta:* `kerjuu+N+Sg+Par`
* *kerjuuseen:* `kerjuu+N+Sg+Ill`

Monosyllabic long vowel stems have illative suffixes of form -hVn.


*Nouns 18 a examples:*
* *maa:* `maa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # earth)
* *maata:* `maa+N+Sg+Par`
* *maahan:* `maa+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 e examples:*
* *tee:* `tee+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # tea)
* *teetä:* `tee+N+Sg+Par`
* *teehen:* `tee+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 i back examples:*
* *hai:* `hai+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # shark)
* *haita:* `hai+N+Sg+Par`
* *haihin:* `hai+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 i examples:*
* *pii:* `pii+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # silica)
* *piitä:* `pii+N+Sg+Par`
* *piihin:* `pii+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 o examples:*
* *ookoo:* `ookoo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # OK)
* *ookoota:* `ookoo+N+Sg+Par`
* *ookoohon:* `ookoo+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 u examples:*
* *puu:* `puu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # tree)
* *puuta:* `puu+N+Sg+Par`
* *puuhun:* `puu+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 y examples:*
* *pyy:* `pyy+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. kind of a bird)
* *pyytä:* `pyy+N+Sg+Par`
* *pyyhyn:* `pyy+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 ä examples:*
* *pää:* `pää+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # head)
* *päätä:* `pää+N+Sg+Par`
* *päähän:* `pää+N+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 18 ö examples:*
* *köö:* `köö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. pool/billiard stick)
* *köötä:* `köö+N+Sg+Par`
* *kööhön:* `köö+N+Sg+Ill`

### Opening diphthong stems
In old opening diphthong final words, the dipthong simplifies for plural
forms by dropping the initial vowel. For new words of this class, no
stem mutations happen and they are in above mentioned classes, (e.g.
NOUN_ZOMBIE).


*Nouns 19 ie examples:*
* *tie:* `tie+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # road)
* *tietä:* `tie+N+Sg+Par`
* *teitä:* `tie+N+Pl+Par`


*Nouns 19 uo examples:*
* *suo:* `suo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # swamp)
* *suota:* `suo+N+Sg+Par`
* *soita:* `suo+N+Pl+Par`

THIS WAS MISSING 2015-08-23, REDIRECTING Jaska

*Nouns 19 yö examples:*
* *työ:* `työ+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # work)
* *työtä:* `työ+N+Sg+Par`
* *töitä:* `työ+N+Pl+Par`

### Newer loan words
The loan words that end in long vowel, and have been modified to Finnish
orthography, have combination of long vowel stem’s allomorphs for e.g
illatives. Sometimes rules for these classes of words are vague.


*Nouns 20 a examples:*
* *nugaa:* `nugaa+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # nougat)
* *nugaata:* `nugaa+N+Sg+Par`
* *nugaana:* `nugaa+N+Sg+Ess`
* *nugaahan:* `nugaa+N+Sg+Ill`
* *nugaaseen:* `nugaa+N+Sg+Ill`
* *nugaissa:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Ine`
* *nugaista:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Ela`
* *nugaiden:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Gen`
* *nugaitten:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Gen`
* *nugaisiin:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Ill`
* *nugaihin:* `nugaa+N+Pl+Ill`
